trunk/incubator/apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="es/i__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Adjectives -->
    <pardef n="otr/u__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="asturian/u__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Decide if we want to have mn.pl or m.pl + nt.pl -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="esi"><i>es</i><par n="es/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="esti"><i>est</i><par n="es/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nesi"><p><l>nes</l><r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>es</r></p><par n="es/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nesti"><p><l>nest</l><r>en<s n="pr"/><j/>es</r></p><par n="es/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="otru"><i>otr</i><par n="otr/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="asturianu"><i>asturian</i><par n="asturian/u__adj"/></e>
